Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1943
Deny, refuse renewal of, or take
disciplinary action against license; department; notice; contents; hearing.

(1)
Except as provided in section 71-1938, if the department determines to deny,
refuse renewal of, or take disciplinary action against a license, the department
shall send to the applicant or licensee, by certified mail to the last-known
address shown on the records of the department, a notice setting forth the
determination, the particular reasons for the determination, including a specific
description of the nature of the violation and the statute, rule, or regulation
violated, and the type of disciplinary action which is pending. The denial,
refusal to renew, or disciplinary action shall become final fifteen days after
the mailing of the notice unless the applicant or licensee, within such fifteen-day
period, makes a written request for a hearing under section 71-1944.

(2) A copy of
the notice in subsection (1) of this section shall also be mailed to the holder
of the license if the holder is not actually involved in the daily operation
of the residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency. If the holder
of the license is a corporation, a copy of the notice shall be sent to the
corporation's registered agent.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 20.